Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB37.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 72.450 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A coroner who has possession of a dead body or a part thereof shall make a
bona fide attempt of at least six (6) months to notify the spouse, if any, or
next of kin of the decedent's death. In the event the coroner is unable to locate
the spouse, if any, or next of kin, he or she may cause the body to be buried or
cremated at the expense of the fiscal court, consolidated local government, or
urban-county government, whichever is appropriate.
(b) The decision between burial or cremation shall be made by the coroner,
fiscal court, consolidated local government, or urban-county government
that has responsibility for the expense pursuant to this subsection.
(c) If a fiscal court, consolidated local government, or urban-county
government has responsibility for the expense pursuant to this subsection, it
shall:
1. Consult with the local county coroner before it makes the decision
between burial and cremation; and
2. If the dead body or a part thereof is known to be of Jewish descent,
contact the Chabad of the Bluegrass or any successor entity to inquire
if it wants to pay for the burial expense.
(2) In the event the body is buried or cremated at public expense, the coroner shall take
possession of all money or other property found on or belonging to the decedent
and shall deliver same to the fiscal court, consolidated local government, or urban-
county government, whichever is appropriate. Any money or other property found
on the body of the decedent or belonging to him or her shall be delivered by the
coroner to the fiscal court, consolidated local government, or urban-county
government, whichever is appropriate, to help defray burial or cremation expenses.
Page 1 of 2
SB003710.100 - 310 - XXXX 2/7/2025 9:54 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 37/GA
Any excess funds shall escheat to such governmental agency one (1) year
thereafter.
(3) In lieu of having an unclaimed body buried or cremated at public expense, the
coroner may deliver such body or part thereof to a state medical school in
accordance with the provisions of KRS 311.300 to 311.350.
Page 2 of 2
SB003710.100 - 310 - XXXX 2/7/2025 9:54 AM GA